tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
! needs them yet -- deferred rather than wired speculatively. ni's own
! default (non-trigger) NASAL/SUPPR branches are likewise NOT wired: no
! gold word attests either one for "ni" specifically with a root already
! in this lexicon.
!
! Known extra false-positive risk from this default-branch SUPPR-marked
! entries specifically (distinct from candidate A's NASAL entries, which
! only ever touch a genuine q): SUPPR was always defined to delete
! whatever consonant precedes it out of q/k/t INDISCRIMINATELY, reachable
! now from the generic NounEndings hub, it fires for a T-FINAL root
! reaching one of these new entries too, not just the Q-final case
! candidate B's CSV row was actually describing (confirmed:
! "milianik"/"milianit" -- unrelated gold words with root "milian" --
! now also match via bulk-generated root "miliat" + SUPPRnik/SUPPRnit,
! "miliat"'s own final t deleted the same way a q would be). Same
! accepted/canary-tracked risk category as every other plain-unmarked or
! generically-scoped entry in this file, not a new kind of bug --
! full_corpus_check.py's correct-not-present count is the ongoing signal.
!
! "mut"/tn-dat-s: "arraagumut" = {arraagu:arraagu/1n}{mut:mut/tn-dat-s}
! (V-context, plain, single candidate). The t-context is NOT implemented:
! it has three candidate forms and no algorithmic disambiguator. The
! q-context is Lever A itself, described above. A consonant-final root
! reaching the plain V-context entry concatenates "mut" unchanged, which
! is likely WRONG for a t-final stem (not modeling the real t-context
! behavior) -- a known, accepted risk, canary-checked by rerunning
! tools/fst/full_corpus_check.py (its "correct-not-present" count is
! exactly the signal for this).
++mut+tn-dat-s:mut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:NASALmut # ;
++mut+tn-dat-s:SUPPRmut # ;

! "mit"/tn-abl-s: same Lever A shape as mut/nik/etc's default branch
! (plain/NASAL/SUPPR wired in parallel; its own q-form is the same
! id-conditional pattern as those, and "paaq"/1nn -- see
! "kingulliqpaamit"/"sivulliqpaamit" -- isn't one of the trigger ids, so
! it falls to the default branch).
++mit+tn-abl-s:mit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:NASALmit # ;
++mit+tn-abl-s:SUPPRmit # ;

! "nik"/tn-acc-p: "arraagunik" = {arraagu:arraagu/1n}{nik:nik/tn-acc-p}
! -- V-context only (V-form=nik/Neutral, single candidate). The
! t/k-context is deferred the same way as mut's t-context (k-context is
! the Lever A id-conditional pattern); same accepted plain-unmarked-entry
! risk as "mut", canary-checked by full_corpus_check.py's
! "correct-not-present" count.
++nik+tn-acc-p:nik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:NASALnik # ;
++nik+tn-acc-p:SUPPRnik # ;

! "ngit"/tn-nom-p-4s: "akingit" = {aki:aki/1n}{ngit:ngit/tn-nom-p-4s}
! (V-context, plain) and "atingit" = {ati:atiq/1n}{ngit:ngit/tn-nom-p-4s}
! (q-context, root's final q deleted). V-form=ngit/Neutral,
! k/q-form=ngit/Suppression -- all single candidate, genuine rule, reuses
! SUPPR unchanged. t-context has two candidates (Insertion "i" vs
! Suppression, no algorithmic disambiguator) -- deferred, same policy as
! every such case.
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:SUPPRngit # ;
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:SUPPRngit QParticles ;

! Also an unconditional "ngi"-only spelling (own trailing "t"
! dropped), found via already-correct gold siblings ("asingit"/
! "ilangit" alongside the failing "asingi"/"ilangi", same
! decomposition each) -- same "extra truncated free variant"
! shape as "it"/tn-nom-p's own "t"-only candidate above.
++ngit+tn-nom-p-4s:SUPPRngi # ;

! "ni"/tn-loc-p: "amisuni" = {amisu:amisu/1n}{ni:ni/tn-loc-p}. V-only
! (V-form=ni/Neutral); t/k/q all ambiguous or id-conditional, deferred.
++ni+tn-loc-p:ni # ;

! Also a SUPPR-prefixed default-branch candidate (Lever A's own
! q-context pattern, described above, extended to "ni" specifically):
! "avittuqsimajuni" needs "juq"/1vn's own trailing q deleted before
! "ni" attaches -- not attested for "ni" before now (see the Lever A
! comment above, which explicitly deferred this), confirmed by this
! real example rather than wired speculatively.
++ni+tn-loc-p:SUPPRni # ;

! "mik"/tn-acc-s: "ministamik" = {minista:minista/1n}{mik:mik/tn-acc-s}.
! V-only, same deferral pattern as "mut"/"nik". (Not "illumik" =
! {illu:iglu/1n}{mik:mik/tn-acc-s}, despite "iglu" already being a
! lexicon root: it surfaces here as "illu" -- a g->l alternation not seen
! when the same root attaches to "it"/tn-nom-p ("igluit", unchanged) --
! not understood yet, avoided rather than guessed at.)
++mik+tn-acc-s:mik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:NASALmik # ;
++mik+tn-acc-s:SUPPRmik # ;

! "nginnut"/tn-dat-p-4s: "akinginnut" =
! {aki:aki/1n}{nginnut:nginnut/tn-dat-p-4s}. V+k+q (all single candidate,
! k/q both Suppression, reuses SUPPR); t-context ambiguous, deferred.
! Note: Endings_noun.csv has TWO "nginnut" rows (perPoss=4, numbPoss=s vs
! numbPoss=p) -- used the numbPoss=s one (matches the gold id
! "tn-dat-p-4s" exactly); the numbPoss=p row is a different id, not
! implemented.
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:SUPPRnginnut # ;
++nginnut+tn-dat-p-4s:SUPPRnginnut QParticles ;

! "nginnik"/tn-acc-p-4s: same shape as nginnut/nginnit/nginni (V-context
! Neutral, reuses SUPPR for the k/q-context Suppression rows, none of
! which are gold-attested here).
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:SUPPRnginnik # ;
++nginnik+tn-acc-p-4s:SUPPRnginnik QParticles ;

! "nut"/tn-dat-p: same shared NounEndings hub deliberately serves "it"
! (reached from bare noun roots via NounContinuations) and "nut" (reached
! from NnSuffixes-derived stems like "kkut"): "it" and "nut" should
! always be the same reachable set, since ANY noun-like stem can take ANY
! tn-ending -- e.g. "tuinnaq"/1nn (NnSuffixes) needs to reach "it" too.
! Gained the same default-branch NASAL/SUPPR pair as Lever A's other
! endings above: "surusirnut" (root "surusiq", Nasalization: q->r) versus
! "nutaanut"/"ukiunut" (roots "nutaaq"/"ukiuq", Suppression: q simply
! deleted) -- same root-dependent split, both real. nut's own TRIGGER
! branch (Suppression when preceded specifically by juq/1vn/ksaq/1nn/
! jaq/3vn) is wired in NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix below, confirmed
! via "ajjigiinngittunut".
++nut+tn-dat-p:nut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:NASALnut # ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:SUPPRnut # ;

! Also an unconditional "nu"-only spelling (own trailing "t" dropped),
! found via already-correct gold siblings ("inunnut"/"inungnut"
! alongside the failing "inunnu"; "nunalingnut"/"nunalinnut" alongside
! the failing "nunalinnu"). Plain, NOT SUPPR-prefixed: the doubled "n"
! these words need ("inuk"+"nu" -> "inunnu") comes from a NEW general
! k->n assimilation rule (phonology.xfscript, same total-regressive-
! assimilation family as t->n/k->t/p->t/t->m/k->m/m->n) firing on the
! PRECEDING root's own final k -- SUPPR would delete that k outright
! before the assimilation rule ever got a chance, giving the wrong
! single-n "inunu" instead. The same new rule also resolves
! "inunnut"/"nunalinnut" for free via the EXISTING plain "nut"
! candidate above, no lexc change needed for those two.
++nut+tn-dat-p:nu # ;

! "inuusilirijikkunullu" needs "nut"/tn-dat-p to ALSO reach QParticles
! (lu/1q's own enclitic can follow a fully-inflected noun, same
! established pattern as "ga"/tn-nom-s-1s etc above).
++nut+tn-dat-p:nut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:NASALnut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:SUPPRnut QParticles ;
++nut+tn-dat-p:nu QParticles ;

! "titut"/tn-sim-p is a K-CONTEXT (not q) single-candidate Neutral row --
! same literal "titut" text as V-context, so needs no separate marker,
! one plain entry covers both. Target word is "inuttitut" (root "inuk",
! k-final), NOT the more obvious "inuktitut": the general k->t rule below
! (for "quviattunga") correctly assimilates "inuk"+"titut" -> "inuttitut"
! -- confirmed by testing the generator direction directly. "inuktitut"
! (no assimilation) is gold-attested too but almost certainly the
! lexicalized proper-noun spelling of the language name itself, not a
! compositional form; left unimplemented rather than fighting an
! already-correct general rule for one irregular spelling. Its own
! q-context is the same Lever A trigger-conditional shape, but NOT
! implemented: the one gold word that would exercise it
! ("qallunaatitut") has an unrelated, unexplained root-internal
! alternation (qaplunaaq -> qallunaa, same category as iglu->illu), so
! there's no clean example to verify against.
!
! "mit"/tn-abl-s was investigated with the same V+trigger+default shape
! as "mut" and initially left unimplemented: every gold word that would
! exercise its q-context chained through an already-unimplemented
! dependency (luaq/1vv) or an unrelated root alternation, and no
! V-context example existed either -- since implemented above once
! "kingulliqpaamit"/"sivulliqpaamit" (paaq/1nn) provided a clean example.
! "tut"/tn-sim-s remains unattested anywhere in the 985-word gold
! standard, not worth implementing blind.
++titut+tn-sim-p:titut # ;

! "inuktitut" (k preserved, NOT assimilated) is ALSO gold-attested
! alongside "inuttitut" above -- previously left unimplemented on the
! assumption it was purely the lexicalized proper-noun spelling of the
! language name, not reachable without "fighting" the general k->t
! rule. Now that KGUARD exists (built for "qulluktuq"'s own root-
! internal k->t self-corruption), the same trick generalizes to an
! inter-morpheme boundary: a KGUARD-prefixed candidate here blocks the
! rule for JUST this parallel path, while the plain "titut" candidate
! above still assimilates normally for whatever other roots need it --
! not decomposable by the real Java analyzer either (confirmed via
! --pipeline).
++titut+tn-sim-p:KGUARDtitut # ;

! "mi"/tn-loc-s: "arraagumi" = {arraagu:arraagu/1n}{mi:mi/tn-loc-s} --
! V-context only (V-form=mi/Neutral, single candidate). t/k/q-contexts
! NOT implemented: t-context has two candidates (Assimilation/Insertion,
! no algorithmic disambiguator); k-context's action is the Lever A
! id-conditional pattern. Same accepted plain-unmarked-entry risk as
! "mut"/"nik", canary-checked by full_corpus_check.py's
! "correct-not-present" count.
++mi+tn-loc-s:mi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:NASALmi # ;
++mi+tn-loc-s:SUPPRmi # ;

! "nit"/tn-abl-p: "arraagunit" = {arraagu:arraagu/1n}{nit:nit/tn-abl-p}
! -- V-context only (V-form=nit/Neutral, single candidate). t-context has
! two candidates (Assimilation/Insertion, no disambiguator); q-context is
! Lever A, described above.
++nit+tn-abl-p:nit # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:NASALnit # ;
++nit+tn-abl-p:SUPPRnit # ;

! "up"/tn-gen-s: "arraaguup" = {arraagu:arraagu/1n}{up:up/tn-gen-s}
! (V-context, plain concatenation). Same action1+action2 shape as
! "it"/tn-nom-p: V/k/q-form all carry Selfdecapitation as action2, which
! only fires when the stem left behind by action1 would end in two
! vowels -- not the case for "arraagu" (single-vowel-final), so not
! modeled here, same deliberate deferral as "it". k/q-context reuses
! SUPPR unchanged (Suppression, same mechanism as "it"/"liri"/"gaq"/
! "lik"/"ngit") -- mechanically identical and low-risk to extend even
! without its own gold-standard-attested k/q example handy, verified
! instead by the standard negative-form-rejected + full-corpus-
! regression checks. t-context has two candidates (Suppression/
! Insertion), deferred as usual.
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRup # ;

! Two more free-variant spellings, found the same way as "it"/
! tn-nom-p's own "t"-only candidate above (checking whether an
! already-correct gold "sibling" exists with one extra/fewer letter):
! "u"-only (own trailing "p" dropped -- gold attests both
! "ministaup" and "ministau" for the identical decomposition) and
! "p"-only (own leading "u" dropped, merging with a preceding vowel --
! gold attests both "iksivautaup" and "iksivautap"). This was ALSO an
! already-documented gap ("a bare 'p'-only candidate for up/tn-gen-s
! (blocks 'iksivautap')", noted under "ut"/1vn's own comment above)
! finally closed with a real example in hand.
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRu # ;
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRp # ;
